Idaho, session 2026, H0679.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-202A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-202A. DEFENSE OF SELF, OTHERS AND CERTAIN PLACES. (1) No person in
this state shall be placed in legal jeopardy of any kind whatsoever for pro-
tecting himself or his family others by reasonable means necessary, or when
coming to the aid of another whom he reasonably believes to be in imminent
danger of or the victim of aggravated assault, robbery, rape, murder or other
heinous crime.
(2) The defense of self or of another does not require a person to wait
until he or she ascertains whether the danger is apparent or real. A person
confronted with such danger has a clear right to act upon appearances such as
would influence the action of a reasonable person.
(3) In the exercise of the right of self-defense or defense of another,
a person need not retreat from any place that person has a right to be. A per-
son may stand his ground and defend himself or another person by the use of
all force and means which would appear to be necessary to a reasonable per-
son in a similar situation and with similar knowledge without the benefit of
hindsight. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a person in-
carcerated in jail or prison facilities when interacting with jail or prison
staff who are acting in their official capacities.
(4) In exercising the right of self-defense or defense of another, a mo-
tor vehicle operator shall have no criminal liability for injuries to, death
of, or damage to property of any person the operator reasonably believes is
attempting, or is aiding and abetting an attempt, to commit aggravated as-
sault, robbery, rape, kidnapping, murder, or other heinous crime on the op-
erator or any occupants of the vehicle. The operator in such a situation may
use the vehicle as a means of defense and escape in any way that would appear
to be necessary to a reasonable person in a similar situation and with simi-
lar knowledge without the benefit of hindsight.
(4) (5) In any prosecution for the unlawful use of force, including
deadly force, or the attempted or threatened use of force contrary to title
18, Idaho Code, the burden is on the prosecution to prove beyond a reasonable


doubt that the use of force, attempted use of force or threat to use force was
not justifiable.
(5) (6) A person using force or deadly force in defense of a habitation,
place of business or employment or occupied vehicle as defined in section
18-4009(3), Idaho Code, is presumed to have acted reasonably and had a rea-
sonable fear of imminent peril of death or serious bodily injury if the force
is used against a person whose entry or attempted entry therein is unlaw-
ful and is made or attempted by use of force, or in a violent and tumultuous
manner, or surreptitiously or by stealth, or for the purpose of committing a
felony.
SECTION 2. That Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 34, Title 67, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 34
PUBLIC ASSEMBLIES ON ROADS
67-3401. LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE AND INTENT. The legislature affirms that
the right of the public to peacefully assemble is among the most fundamen-
tal of all rights and necessary in a free society. At the same time, the
legislature recognizes that assemblies on roads, especially high-traffic
or high-speed roads, may create safety hazards both for those assembling
and for other users of the road. In enacting this chapter, the legislature
intends to protect public safety while upholding the importance of public
roads as a traditional forum for public assembly.
67-3402. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public assembly" means a group of persons organized and united for
a common purpose in a public setting.
(2) "Public entity" means the state of Idaho or any political subdi-
vision thereof, including all boards, commissions, agencies, institutions,
authorities, and bodies corporate and politic of the state, created by or in
accordance with state law or regulations.
(3) "Public street" or "highway" is as described in section 49-109(4),
Idaho Code.
(4) "Spontaneous assembly" means a public assembly on or alongside a
public road for which a permit was not issued in accordance with a policy
adopted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(5) "Traffic" is as defined in section 49-121, Idaho Code.
67-3403. PERMIT POLICY. (1) Each public entity with authority to close
public streets or highways shall establish a policy under which a person may
apply for a permit to close a public street or highway for the purpose of a
public assembly.
(2) A policy adopted pursuant to this section may establish reasonable
time, place, and manner restrictions on road closures but may not discrimi-
nate based on the purpose of the public assembly or the viewpoint of a permit
applicant, except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) A public entity may inquire as to the purpose or nature of a public
assembly to determine:


(a) Whether an assembly would be unlawful for purposes of chapter 64,
title 18, Idaho Code; and
(b) Whether peace officers may need to be present to protect the safety
of assembly participants or to preserve public order.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Require a public entity to provide a permit for an unlawful assem-
bly;
(b) Prevent a public entity with authority to do so from dispersing an
unlawful assembly; or
(c) Prevent a public entity with authority to do so from detaining, ar-
resting, or prosecuting participants in an unlawful assembly.
67-3404. SPONTANEOUS ASSEMBLIES. A policy adopted pursuant to section
67-3403, Idaho Code, shall provide that participants in spontaneous assem-
blies:
(1) May not block or otherwise obstruct traffic; and
(2) Shall comply with all applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations
for persons on or alongside a public road.
67-3405. PENALTIES. (1) A participant in a public assembly who fails
to comply with the terms of a permit shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punish-
able by imprisonment in the county jail for up to six (6) months, a fine of up
to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both such imprisonment and fine.
(2) A participant in a spontaneous assembly who fails to comply with an
applicable law, ordinance, or regulation for persons on or alongside a pub-
lic street or highway shall, in addition to any other penalty prescribed by
law, ordinance, or regulation, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.